Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1505
Counterfeiting; instruments or means; how described.

In any indictment for engraving or making the whole or any part of any instrument, matter or thing, or for using or having the unlawful custody or possession of any plate or other material upon which the whole or any part of any instrument, matter or thing shall have been engraved or made, or for having the unlawful custody or possession of any paper upon which the whole or any part of any instrument, matter or thing shall have been made or printed, it shall be sufficient to describe such instruments, matter or thing by any name or designation by which the same may be usually known.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 415, p. 817;

R.S.1913, § 9054;

C.S.1922, § 10078;

C.S.1929, § 29-1505;

R.S.1943, § 29-1505.